California statutes. Business and Professions Code
Any violation of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment, and any such violation or threatened violation shall be actionable under Section 17535 of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 51.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

17523.

Any blind workman, who is a citizen or resident of this State, or any institution, public or private, corporation, partnership, and association engaged within this State in the manufacture, sale, or distribution of articles or merchandise, made, manufactured, or fabricated by blind workmen is authorized to imprint or stamp upon such articles or merchandise or affix thereto, labels containing the words “made by a blind workman,” or “made by the blind,” or “blind-made,” if not less than 75 percent of the total hours of direct labor of producing said products have been performed by a blind workman. Such labels, shall also have the place of manufacture on them and, if desired,
 the name of the particular workman who made, manufactured, or fabricated the article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 766.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.6. Cyber Piracy [17525. - 17528.5.]

17525.

(a) It is unlawful for a person, with a bad faith intent, to register, traffic in, or use a domain or subdomain name that is identical or confusingly similar to, because of, among other things, misspelling of the domain or subdomain name, either of the following:

(1) The personal name of another living person or deceased personality, without regard to the goods or services of the parties.

(2) The name of any of the following used to sell or resell, or offer to sell or resell, goods:

(A) A specific professional or collegiate sports team, professional or collegiate sports league, theme or amusement park, or venue where concerts, sports, or
 other live entertainment events are held.

(B) A specific event, performance, or exhibition, including the name of a person, professional or collegiate team, performance, group, or entity scheduled to perform or appear at that event.

(b) This section does not apply in the case of a name registered as a domain name or subdomain name in either of the following circumstances:

(1) The personal name described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is connected to a work of authorship, including, but not limited to, fictional or nonfictional entertainment, and dramatic, literary, audiovisual, or musical works.

(2) The person whose personal name is described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or the authorized agent of an entity whose name is described by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) consents to the registration, trafficking, or use of the name as a domain or subdomain name.

(c) A domain name registrar, a domain name registry, or any other domain name registration authority that takes any action described in subdivision (a) that affects a domain name shall not be liable to any person for that action, regardless of whether the domain name is finally determined to infringe or dilute a trademark or service mark.

(d) A party who has
 suffered injury in fact and has lost money or property as a result of a violation of this section may bring a civil action for recovery of actual, consequential, and punitive damages, if warranted, and shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees if the action is resolved in that party’s favor.

(e) For purposes of this section, “goods” includes tickets to a concert, sporting event, or other live entertainment event. “Goods” also includes clothing and memorabilia bearing the name or trademark of an entity described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(f) A person who registers, traffics in, or uses a domain or subdomain name in violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) without the consent described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) is presumed to have done so with a bad faith intent. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(g) The remedies provided by this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting a remedy that is otherwise available, including, but not limited to, a remedy available under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 14200) of Division 6, or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 2.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17526.

In determining whether there is a bad faith intent pursuant to Section 17525, a court, consistent with 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1125(d)(1)(B)(i) as that section read on January 1, 2019, may consider factors, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) The trademark or other intellectual property rights of the person alleged to be in violation of this article, if any, in the domain name.

(b) The extent to which the domain name consists of the legal name
 of the person alleged to be in violation of this article or a name that is otherwise commonly used to identify that person.

(c) The prior use, if any, by the person alleged to be in violation of this article of the domain name in connection with the bona fide
 offering of any goods or services.

(d) The legitimate noncommercial or fair use of the name in an internet website accessible under the domain name by the person alleged to be in violation of this article.

(e) The intent of a person alleged to be in violation of this article to
 do either of the following:

(1) Divert consumers from the person’s or deceased personality’s online location to a site accessible under the domain name that could harm the goodwill represented by the person’s or deceased personality’s name either for commercial gain or with the intent to tarnish or disparage the person’s or deceased personality’s name by creating a likelihood of confusion as to the source, sponsorship, affiliation, or endorsement of the site.

(2) Divert consumers from the online location of an entity described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 17525 to a site accessible under the domain name that could harm the goodwill represented by that entity’s name either for commercial gain or with the intent to tarnish or disparage the
 entity by creating a likelihood of confusion as to the source, sponsorship, affiliation, or endorsement of the site.

(f) The offer by a person alleged to be in violation of this article to transfer, sell, or otherwise assign the domain name to the rightful owner or any third party for substantial consideration without having used, or having an intent to use, the domain name in the bona fide offering of any goods or services.

(g) The intentional provision by the person alleged to be in violation of this article of material and misleading false contact information when applying for the registration of the domain name.

(h) The registration or acquisition by the person alleged to be in violation of this article of multiple
 domain names that are identical or confusingly similar to names
 described in subdivision (a) of Section 17525.

(i) Whether the person alleged to be in violation of this article sought or obtained consent from the rightful owner to register, traffic in, or use the domain name.

(j) The intent of a person alleged to be in violation of this article to mislead, deceive, or defraud users of the internet website, including consumers and voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 162, Sec. 2.   (SB 342)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

17527.

As used in this article:

(a) “Deceased personality” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 3344.1 of the Civil Code.

(b) “Domain name” means any alphanumeric designation that is registered with or assigned by any domain name registrar, domain name registry, or other domain name registration authority as part of an electronic address on the internet.

(c) “Internet” shall have the meaning specified in Section 17538.

(d) “Traffic in” refers to transactions that include, but are not limited to, sales, purchases, loans, pledges, licenses, exchanges of currency, or any other transfer for consideration or receipt in exchange for consideration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17528.

Jurisdiction for actions brought pursuant to this article shall be in accordance with Section 410.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17528.5.

In addition to any other remedies available under law, a court may order the transfer of a domain name as part of the relief awarded for a violation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.8. Restrictions On Unsolicited Commercial E-mail Advertisers [17529. - 17529.9.]

17529.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Roughly 40 percent of all e-mail traffic in the United States is comprised of unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisements (hereafter spam) and industry experts predict that by the end of 2003 half of all e-mail traffic will be comprised of spam.

(b) The increase in spam is not only an annoyance but is also an increasing drain on corporate budgets and possibly a threat
 to the continued usefulness of the most successful tool of the computer age.

(c) Complaints from irate business and home-computer users regarding spam have skyrocketed, and polls have reported that 74 percent of respondents favor making mass spamming illegal and only 12 percent are opposed, and that 80 percent of respondents consider spam very annoying.

(d) According to Ferris Research Inc., a San Francisco consulting group, spam will cost United States organizations more than ten billion dollars ($10,000,000,000) this year, including lost productivity and the additional equipment, software, and manpower needed to combat the problem. California is 12 percent of the United States population with an emphasis on technology business, and it is therefore estimated that spam costs California organizations well over 1.2 billion dollars ($1,200,000,000).

(e) Like junk faxes, spam imposes a cost on users, using up valuable storage space in e-mail inboxes, as well as costly computer band width, and on networks and the computer servers that power them, and discourages people from using e-mail.

(f) Spam filters have not proven effective.

(g) Like traditional paper “junk” mail, spam can be annoying and waste time, but it also causes many additional problems because it is easy and inexpensive to create, but difficult and costly to eliminate.

(h) The “cost shifting” from deceptive spammers to Internet business and e-mail users has been likened to sending junk mail with postage due or making telemarketing calls to someone’s pay-per-minute cellular phone.

(i) Many spammers have become so adept at masking their tracks that they are rarely found, and are so technologically sophisticated that they can adjust their systems to counter special filters and other barriers against spam and can even electronically commandeer unprotected computers, turning them into spam-launching weapons of mass production.

(j) There is a need to regulate the advertisers who use spam, as well as the actual spammers, because the actual spammers can be difficult to track down due to some return addresses that show up on the display as “unknown” and many others being obvious fakes and they are often located offshore.

(k) The true beneficiaries of spam are the advertisers who benefit from the marketing derived from the advertisements.

(l) In addition, spam is responsible for
 virus proliferation that can cause tremendous damage both to individual computers and to business systems.

(m) Because of the above problems, it is necessary that spam be prohibited and that commercial advertising e-mails be regulated as set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 487, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17529.1.

For the purpose of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Advertiser” means a person or entity that advertises through the use of commercial e-mail advertisements.

(b) “California electronic mail address” or “California e-mail address” means any of the following:

(1) An e-mail address furnished by an electronic mail service provider that sends bills for
 furnishing and maintaining that e-mail address to a mailing address in this state.

(2) An e-mail address ordinarily accessed from a computer located in this state.

(3) An e-mail address furnished to a resident of this state.

(c) “Commercial e-mail advertisement” means any electronic mail message initiated for the purpose of advertising or promoting the lease, sale, rental, gift offer, or other disposition of any property, goods, services, or extension of credit.

(d) “Direct consent” means that the recipient has expressly consented to receive e-mail advertisements from the advertiser, either in response to a clear and conspicuous request for the consent or at the recipient’s own initiative.

(e) “Domain name” means any alphanumeric designation that is registered with or assigned by any domain name registrar as part of an electronic address on the Internet.

(f) “Electronic mail” or “e-mail” means an electronic message that is sent to an e-mail address and transmitted between two or more telecommunications devices, computers, or electronic devices capable of receiving electronic messages, whether or not the message is converted to hard copy format after receipt, viewed upon transmission, or stored for later retrieval. “Electronic mail” or “e-mail” includes electronic messages that are transmitted through a local, regional, or global computer network.

(g) “Electronic mail address” or “e-mail address” means a destination, commonly expressed as a string of characters, to which electronic mail can be sent or delivered. An “electronic mail address” or “e-mail
 address” consists of a user name or mailbox and a reference to an Internet domain.

(h) “Electronic mail service provider” means any person, including an Internet service provider, that is an intermediary in sending or receiving electronic mail or that provides to end users of the electronic mail service the ability to send or receive electronic mail.

(i) “Initiate” means to transmit or cause to be transmitted a commercial e-mail advertisement or assist in the transmission of a commercial e-mail advertisement by providing electronic mail addresses where the advertisement may be sent, but does not include the routine transmission of the advertisement through the network or system of a telecommunications utility or an electronic mail service provider through its network or system.

(j) “Incident” means a single
 transmission or delivery to a single recipient or to multiple recipients of an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement containing substantially similar content.

(k) “Internet” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) of Section 17538.

(l) “Preexisting or current business relationship,” as used in connection with the sending of a commercial e-mail advertisement, means that the recipient has made an inquiry and has provided his or her e-mail address, or has made an application, purchase, or transaction, with or without consideration, regarding products or services offered by the advertiser.

Commercial e-mail advertisements sent pursuant to the exemption provided for a preexisting or current business relationship shall provide the recipient of the commercial e-mail advertisement with the ability to “opt-out”
 from receiving further commercial e-mail advertisements by calling a toll-free telephone number or by sending an “unsubscribe” e-mail to the advertiser offering the products or services in the commercial e-mail advertisement. This opt-out provision does not apply to recipients who are receiving free e-mail service with regard to commercial e-mail advertisements sent by the provider of the e-mail service.

(m) “Recipient” means the addressee of an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement. If an addressee of an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement has one or more e-mail addresses to which an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement is sent, the addressee shall be deemed to be a separate recipient for each e-mail address to which the e-mail advertisement is sent.

(n) “Routine transmission” means the transmission, routing, relaying, handling, or storing of an electronic
 mail message through an automatic technical process. “Routine transmission” shall not include the sending, or the knowing participation in the sending, of unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisements.

(o) “Unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement” means a commercial e-mail advertisement sent to a recipient who meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The recipient has not provided direct consent to receive advertisements from the advertiser.

(2) The recipient does not have a preexisting or current business relationship, as defined in subdivision (l), with the advertiser promoting the lease, sale, rental, gift offer, or other disposition of any property, goods, services, or extension of credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17529.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person or entity may not do any of the following:

(a) Initiate or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement from California or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement sent from California.

(b) Initiate or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement to a California electronic mail address, or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail
 advertisement sent to a California electronic mail address.

(c) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect any other provision or application that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 487, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17529.3.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit or restrict the adoption, implementation, or enforcement by a provider of Internet access service of a policy of declining to transmit, receive, route, relay, handle, or store certain types of electronic mail messages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 487, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17529.4.

(a) It is unlawful for any person or entity to collect electronic mail addresses posted on the Internet if the purpose of the collection is for the electronic mail addresses to be used to do either of the following:

(1) Initiate or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement from California, or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement sent from California.

(2) Initiate or
 advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement to a California electronic mail address, or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement sent to California electronic mail address.

(b) It is unlawful for any person or entity to use an electronic mail address obtained by using automated means based on a combination of names, letters, or numbers to do either of the following:

(1) Initiate or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement from California, or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement sent from California.

(2) Initiate or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement to a California electronic mail address, or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement sent to a California electronic mail address.

(c) It is unlawful for any person to use scripts or other automated means to register for multiple electronic mail accounts from which to do, or to enable another person to do, either of the following:

(1) Initiate or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement from California, or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement sent from California.

(2) Initiate or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement to a California electronic mail address, or advertise in an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement sent to a California electronic mail address.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 487, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17529.5.

(a) It is unlawful for any person or entity to advertise in a commercial e-mail advertisement either sent from California or sent to a California electronic mail address under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The e-mail advertisement contains or is accompanied by a third-party’s domain name without the permission of the third party.

(2) The e-mail advertisement contains or is accompanied by falsified,
 misrepresented, or forged header information. This paragraph does not apply to truthful information used by a third party who has been lawfully authorized by the advertiser to use that information.

(3) The e-mail advertisement has a subject line that a person knows would be likely to mislead a recipient, acting reasonably under the circumstances, about a material fact regarding the contents or subject matter of the message.

(b) (1) (A) In addition to any other remedies provided by any other provision of law, the following may bring an action against a person or entity that violates any provision of this section:

(i) The Attorney General.

(ii) An electronic mail service provider.

(iii) A recipient of an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement, as defined in Section 17529.1.

(B) A person or entity bringing an action pursuant to subparagraph (A) may recover either or both of the following:

(i) Actual damages.

(ii) Liquidated damages of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement transmitted in violation of this section, up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) per incident.

(C) The recipient, an electronic mail service provider, or the Attorney General, if the prevailing plaintiff, may also recover reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(D) However, there shall not
 be a cause of action under this section against an electronic mail service provider that is only involved in the routine transmission of the e-mail advertisement over its computer network.

(2) If the court finds that the defendant established and implemented, with due care, practices and procedures reasonably designed to effectively prevent unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisements that are in violation of this section, the court shall reduce the liquidated damages recoverable under paragraph (1) to a maximum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement, or a maximum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per incident.

(3) (A) A person who has brought an action against a party under this section shall not bring an action against that party under Section 17529.8 or 17538.45 for the same commercial e-mail
 advertisement, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 17529.1.

(B) A person who has brought an action against a party under Section 17529.8 or 17538.45 shall not bring an action against that party under this section for the same commercial e-mail advertisement, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 17529.1.

(c) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

17529.8.

(a) (1) In addition to any other remedies provided by this article or by any other provisions of law, a recipient of an unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement transmitted in violation of this article, an electronic mail service provider, or the Attorney General may bring an action against an entity that violates any provision of this article to recover either or both of the following:

(A) Actual damages.

(B) Liquidated damages of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement transmitted in violation of Section 17529.2, up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) per incident.

(2) The recipient, an electronic mail service provider, or the Attorney General, if the prevailing plaintiff, may also recover reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(3) However, there shall not be a cause of action against an electronic mail service provider that is only involved in the routine transmission of the unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement over its computer network.

(b) If the court finds that the defendant established and implemented, with due care, practices and procedures reasonably designed to effectively prevent unsolicited
 commercial e-mail advertisements that are in violation of this article, the court shall reduce the liquidated damages recoverable under subdivision (a) to a maximum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each unsolicited commercial e-mail advertisement, or a maximum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per incident.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 487, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17529.9.

The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect any other provision or application that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 487, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Particular Offenses [17530. - 17539.6.]

17530.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, or association, or any employee or agent therefor, to make or disseminate any statement or assertion of fact in a newspaper, circular, circular or form letter, or other publication published or circulated, including over the Internet, in any language in this state, concerning the extent, location, ownership, title, or other characteristic, quality, or attribute of any real estate located in this state or elsewhere, which is known to be untrue and which is made or disseminated with the intention of misleading.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to hold the publisher of any newspaper, or any job printer, liable for any publication herein referred to unless the publisher or printer has an interest, either as owner or agent, in the real estate so advertised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 599, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17530.1.

(a) It shall be unlawful for a person to recommend to a prospective trustor any person to serve as trustee with knowledge or having reason to believe that the proposed trustee is insolvent or is about to become insolvent.

For purposes of this section, “insolvent” means a person who has ceased to pay that person’s debts as they become due or whose liabilities exceed that person’s assets.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any trustee named in any deed of trust or mortgage which secures a
 note or evidence of indebtedness on real property when such trustee acts solely in that capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 763.)
-------------------------------------------

17530.5.

(a) It is a misdemeanor for any person, including an individual, firm, corporation, association, partnership, or joint venture, or any employee or agent thereof, to disclose any information obtained in the business of preparing federal or state income tax returns or assisting taxpayers in preparing those returns, including any instance in which this information is obtained through an electronic medium, unless the disclosure is within any of the following:

(1) Consented to in
 writing by the taxpayer in a separate document that states to whom the disclosure will be made and how the information will be used. If the taxpayer agrees, this separate consent document may be in the form of an electronic record, executed by an electronic signature as provided by Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(2) Expressly authorized by state or federal law.

(3) Necessary to the preparation of the return.

(4) Pursuant to court order.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a person is engaged in the business of preparing federal or state income tax returns or assisting taxpayers in preparing those returns if the person does any of the following:

(1) Advertises, or gives publicity to the effect that the person prepares or assists others in the preparation of state or federal income tax returns.

(2) Prepares or assists others in the preparation of state or federal income tax returns for compensation.

(3) Files a state or federal income tax return by electronic transmittal of return data directly to the Franchise Tax Board or to the Internal Revenue Service.

(c) A disclosure prohibited by this section includes a disclosure made internally within the entity preparing or assisting in preparing the return for any purpose other than tax preparation or made by that entity to any of its subsidiaries or affiliates.

(d) For purposes of this section, “affiliate” means any entity that, directly
 or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, another entity.

(e) Contacting a taxpayer to obtain his or her written consent to disclosure does not constitute a violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1084, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17530.7.

It is unlawful for any person, other than a funeral director as defined in Section 7615, to sell, or offer to sell, on a retail basis, a casket, alternative container, or outer burial container, unless that person does all of the following:

(a) Provides to any person, upon beginning any discussion of prices, a written or printed list containing, but not necessarily limited to, the price of all caskets and containers that are normally offered for sale by that seller. The seller shall also provide a
 written statement or list that, at a minimum, specifically identifies particular caskets or containers by price and by thickness of metal, type of wood, or other construction, and by interior and color, when a request for specific information on caskets or containers is made in person by any individual. This information shall also be provided over the telephone, upon request.

(b) Places the price in a conspicuous manner on each casket. Individual price tags on caskets shall include the thickness of metal and type of wood or other construction, as applicable, in addition to interior and color information.

(c) Places in a conspicuous manner on each casket represented as having a sealing device of any kind, the following notices in at least eight-point boldface type: “THERE IS NO SCIENTIFIC OR OTHER EVIDENCE THAT ANY CASKET WITH A SEALING DEVICE WILL PRESERVE HUMAN REMAINS.”

(d) Furnishes to the buyer prior to the sale, a written or printed itemized statement of all costs associated with the sale.

(e) Provides to the buyer a statement that includes a notice to the buyer that he or she may contact the office of the district attorney in that jurisdiction with any questions or complaints. At a minimum, the information shall be in eight-point boldface type, and state the following: “THE SELLER IS NOT A FUNERAL DIRECTOR AND IS NOT LICENSED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF CONSUMER AFFAIRS, AND MAY NOT OFFER OR PERFORM FUNERAL SERVICES. STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS PROHIBIT A FUNERAL DIRECTOR FROM CHARGING HANDLING FEES FOR A CASKET SUPPLIED BY ANOTHER PARTY. THE MONEYS RECEIVED BY THE SELLER FOR THE PURCHASE OF A CASKET ARE NOT SUBJECT TO STATE LAW GOVERNING MONEY HELD IN TRUST. THE SELLER IS NOT BOUND BY STATE LAWS OR REGULATIONS THAT GOVERN FUNERAL HOMES AND CEMETERIES. THE
 PURCHASER ENTERS THIS AGREEMENT AT HIS OR HER OWN RISK. FOR MORE INFORMATION, CONTACT THE OFFICE OF THE DISTRICT ATTORNEY IN YOUR COUNTY.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17531.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, in any newspaper, magazine, circular, form letter or any open publication, published, distributed, or circulated in this state, including over the Internet, or on any billboard, card, label, or other advertising medium, or by means of any other advertising device, to advertise, call attention to or give publicity to the sale of any merchandise, which merchandise is secondhand or used merchandise, or which merchandise is defective in any manner, or which merchandise consists of articles or units or parts known as
 “seconds,” or blemished merchandise, or which merchandise has been rejected by the manufacturer thereof as not first class, unless there is conspicuously displayed directly in connection with the name and description of that merchandise and each specified article, unit, or part thereof, a direct and unequivocal statement, phrase, or word which will clearly indicate that the merchandise or each article, unit, or part thereof so advertised is secondhand, used, defective, or consists of “seconds” or is blemished merchandise, or has been rejected by the manufacturer thereof, as the case may be. Any violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 599, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17531.1.

Every manufacturer, wholesaler, jobber, distributor, or other person, who packages children’s toys for sale to any retailer, shall clearly state on the outside of the package that the toy is unassembled if such is the case. If children’s toys are packaged outside this State, the first wholesaler, jobber, distributor, or other person who has possession or control of the toys in this State in the course of distribution or marketing of such toys for sale to any retailer shall not further distribute or market such toys if they are unassembled unless and until the outside of each package which contains any such toys clearly states that
 the toys are unassembled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 823.)
-------------------------------------------

17531.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Educational conference” means a conference, forum, camp, or other similar event, intended to develop the leadership, career, or college readiness of a student or provide some other form of educational benefit, when participation in the event is represented as being limited to students receiving an award, invitation,
 or nomination to participate in the event. 

(2) “Educational conference organization” or “organization” means a person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that operates in a for-profit manner and that plans and advertises educational conferences to students residing in the State of California.

(3) “Student” means a person who is enrolled in elementary or secondary school, grade kindergarten through grade 12, at the time an educational conference is arranged with an educational conference organization. 

(b) An educational conference organization that provides materials related to an educational conference directly to a school or any employee thereof for purposes of distribution to a student shall comply with all of the following:

(1) The
 organization shall provide the materials in a sealed envelope or other packaging addressed to the parent or legal guardian of the student.

(2) The organization shall include with the materials all of the following disclosures, in clear and conspicuous language:

(A) That the materials constitute a solicitation for the sale of a product.

(B) The legal form of the organization making the solicitation, including the for-profit status of the organization.

(C) The legal owner, if any, of the organization making the solicitation.

(D) The specific eligibility criteria required for participation in the solicited educational conference or conferences, if any.

(E) An itemized list of the costs to participate in the educational conference and the total price of participating in the educational conference, including estimated expenses not included in the price of the educational conference.

(F) That attendance at an educational conference may not affect a student’s chances of being admitted to college and that a parent or guardian should contact the student’s school counselor for more information. 

(G) Whether or not a nomination from a teacher or school administrator is required to participate in the educational conference, or if an individual may be self-nominated or nominated by a parent or guardian.

(H) The total amount, if any, of funding or other support, including employment or grants for school supplies,
 the organization has provided to the student’s school or the school’s employees during the last three years before the date of the solicitation.

(I) A phone number, email address, or Internet Web site that a parent or guardian may use to contact a government agency within the relevant jurisdiction for purposes of filing a complaint related to the solicitation or the educational conference itself.

(3) The organization shall provide the disclosures described in paragraph (2) on separate documents addressed to the school and to any employee thereof who is asked to distribute materials to a student.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   (AB 2609)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17531.5.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, in any newspaper, magazine, circular, form letter, or any open publication, published, distributed, or circulated in the State of California, including over the Internet, or on any billboard, card, label, or other advertising medium, or by means of any other advertising device, to advertise, call attention to, or give publicity to the sale of any merchandise, which merchandise is surplus materials as defined in the federal Surplus Property Act of 1944 (50 U.S.C. App. Sec. 1622 et seq.), unless there is
 conspicuously displayed directly in connection with the name and description of that merchandise and each specified article, unit, or part thereof, a direct and unequivocal statement, phrase, or word which will clearly indicate that the merchandise or each article, unit, or part thereof so advertised is or consists of surplus materials as defined in the federal Surplus Property Act of 1944.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 599, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17531.6.

As used in Sections 17531.7 and 17531.8, the term:

(a) “Picture tube” means cathode ray tube, otherwise known as kinescope or CRT.
